Maine, session 132, LD417.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §8007 is enacted to read:
§8007. Confidentiality of complaints and investigative records
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry.
B. "Conclusion of an investigation" means that an investigation has been closed or one
of the following events has occurred with respect to the investigation:
(1) A notice of an adjudicatory hearing under Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 4
has been issued;
(2) A consent agreement has been executed; or
(3) An enforcement proceeding has been filed in a court of competent jurisdiction.
C. "Department" means the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry.
2. Records obtained during an investigation or through provision of services to
the public. Records of the department are confidential if:
A. The records are obtained during an investigation of a complaint related to a
provision of or suspected violation of this Part; or
B. The records are obtained in connection with providing a service to the public
consistent with the bureau's duties pursuant to this Part.
Records obtained during an investigation of a complaint related to a provision of or
suspected violation of this Part become public upon conclusion of an investigation unless
the records are otherwise classified as confidential by any other provision of law.
3. Exceptions. Notwithstanding subsection 2, during the pendency of an investigation,
a complaint or investigative record may be disclosed:
A. To department employees designated by the commissioner;
B. By a department employee or complaint officer designated by the commissioner
when and to the extent considered necessary to facilitate the investigation;
C. To other state or federal agencies when the records contain evidence of possible
violations of laws enforced by those agencies;
D. Pursuant to rules adopted by the department, when the commissioner determines
that confidentiality is no longer warranted due to general public knowledge of the
circumstances surrounding the complaint or investigation and when the investigation
would not be prejudiced by the disclosure;
E. When and to the extent disclosure is considered necessary by the commissioner to
avoid imminent and serious harm. The authority of the commissioner to make a
disclosure pursuant to this paragraph may not be delegated; and
F. To a person being investigated on that person's request. The commissioner may
refuse to disclose part or all of any investigative information, including the fact of an
Page 1 - 132LR0371(01)

410 investigation, when the commissioner determines that disclosure would prejudice the
421 investigation. The authority of the commissioner to make such a determination may
432 not be delegated.
4. Attorney General records. The disclosure of investigative records of the
Department of the Attorney General to a department employee designated by the
commissioner does not constitute a waiver of the confidentiality of those records for any
other purposes. Further disclosure of those investigative records is subject to Title 16,
section 804 and the discretion of the Attorney General.
5. Violation. A person who knowingly or intentionally makes a disclosure of records
in violation of this section commits a civil violation for which a fine not to exceed $1,000
may be adjudged.